Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.120

Suspension of registration when hazard to public health.

The director may, when the director determines that there is or may be an imminent hazard to the public health and welfare, suspend on the director's own motion, the registration of a pesticide in conformance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 380 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 12.]